Texas, session 891, SB37.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF TEXAS: SECTION 1.  Subchapter C, Chapter 24, Government Code, is amended by adding Sections 24.60046 and 24.60047 to read as follows: Sec. 24.60046.  501ST JUDICIAL DISTRICT (FORT BEND COUNTY). The 501st Judicial District is composed of Fort Bend County. Sec. 24.60047.  502ND JUDICIAL DISTRICT (FORT BEND COUNTY). The 502nd Judicial District is composed of Fort Bend County. SECTION 2.  The 501st and 502nd Judicial Districts are created on the effective date of this Act. SECTION 3.  This Act takes effect on the 91st day after the last day of the legislative session.